hytex/sme-texhyph.dic
nne1b
nnet1
nno2h
nno1r
1no
2noa
no2de
n2oi
n2o2la
no2le
n1oll
non1
no2na
nopo1
nord1
n1org
nos1
n2os.
n2ost
not2t
2n1p2
2n1r
2ns
n1s2j
ns2k
n1ska
n1ske
n1s2l
nso1n
nso1s
n1s2p
ns2t
n1stá
n1su
2n1š
nša2
nš2l
nšun1
2n1t
nta2l
ntá2n
nt1h
ntle1
1nu
nu2b2
nu2g
nu1hu
nuk1
nu2la
nu2m
nu2t
nuvh1
2n1v
nva1
n2ve
nvui1
1n2y
2nz
2nž
n1že1
n1ži
1ŋa2
1ŋá
ŋá2b
ŋá2j
ŋá2m
ŋá2n
ŋe2
ŋ1g
ŋge2
ŋges2
ŋgo2n
ŋgot2
1ŋi
ŋihu1
2ŋir
ŋi2s2
ŋka2
ŋká2
ŋke2n
ŋki2m
ŋ1ko2
ŋku2
ŋ1m
ŋ1ŋ
1ŋo2
ŋo1u
ŋ1r
ŋra2
1ŋu2
1oa
2oad
o2ah
oai1l
o1ali
oame1
oana1
oaná1
o2an1s
2oar
o1are
o1asy
o2att
o1á
obái1
obi1l
ob1u
obu1l
o2bun
oc2ko
očá1
o2da.
o2dal
o2dam
o2das
odat1
odá1l
o2di
odi1s
od2o
o1đ
o1e1
o1f
ofe1
offi1
ofis1
o1g
ogi1v
og2n
o2go
ogu1m
o2hag
o2hav
o2he
ohl1
o1ho
ohti1
ohu1m
1oi.
oi1b2
o2id
1oid.
oida2
1oide
oid2n
1oigu
o1ii
1oin.
o1inm
o2is2t
1oiv
o1ja
ojá1
oji1
o1jo
o1jun
o2k
oka1
okka2
2o1ko
okon1
2oku
o1l
olai1
olá1d
o2leb
o2lep
2oli
oli2m
olk1
ollá2
olmo1
olu1m
o1m
omá1i
o2me
ome1t
o2min
ommu1
om2n1
o2moš
om2pr
om1sk
o2mu
o1na
onai1
on1ar
ona1t
oná1l
o1ne
o2neb
ongo1
o2nin
o2n1j
onvo1
o1o
oo2n
oosk2
oot2
oote2
ope1d
ope1i
o1pra
oprá1
o1pro
opti1
o1ra
ora2h
ora1t
o1rá
ore2n
2orgo
1orig
o1ro
oro2s1
o2sa
osa2l
1osd
o2se
ose2s
os1h
o2si
o2sk
oská2
o1sko
os2mi
os2mu
oso2l
os2t
o1str
2o2š
o1šet
oš2g
oš2l
oš1ol
oš2t
o1t
ot1h
otka1
ot2ro
otsa1
o1ug
o1urb
1out
1ovc
ovi1s
ovle1
ox1
o1y
oy2a
2ož
o2že
o2ži
o2žo
o1ä
ó1a
1p2a
pa2ba
pa2d
paga1
pa2gi
pa2go
pa2l
pal2d
pa2ma
pa2me
pa2ni
pa2nu
para1
pa2ri
pa2s
pau1
1p2á
pá2d
pá1go
pá2h
pá2m
páne1
2pánj
pá2š
páza1
2p1b
1pe
pe1b
peko1
pe2m
pe2na
pero1
pe2ru
pe2s
pes2t
2p1g
2p1h
1p2i
pias1
pi2d
pi1et
pi2li
pin2g
pi1o
pio1n
pir1t
pitá1
piu1
p1j
2pl2
p2la
pla1t
plás1
p1let
p1li
p2lik
p2lo
plo1s
p1lu
2p1m
pmá1h
pme1l
pmer1
pmi2r
pmit1
pmu2
p1n
pnás1
1po
2poa
poas1
po2de
po2do
p2ol
po2la
polá1
pop1l
po2r
porá1
p2os
2p1p
ppa2h
ppá2l
ppá2n
ppá2r
ppen1
pp2l
pplo1
ppo2
pp2r
ppu1m
p1r
p2ra
pra1n
1p2rá
pre1g
1prin
1p2ris
1proj
pros1
1prot
2p1s2
psai1
psi1s
pso1
p1š
2p1t
pta1
1pu
pu2go
pu2r
puta1
2p1v
2rabb
2rač
1ra2d
rae1
ra2gu
1rahi
1rai
2rak
1ral
ral1d
ra2me
ramu1
ra2n
1rana
1rane
1rani
2rans
1raoo
2r1ar
1ras
ra2se
rask2
1rašd
1rašo
ra2tá
1rato1
ra1u1
1raža
2ražž
r2á
1ráđi
1rág
rá1ha
1ráhk
1ráig
1ráje1
1ráji
1rájo
1rál
1rán
1ráss
1rást
1rát
1rávs
2r1b
rba1d
rb2m
2rc
rco2
2rd
r2da
r1de
r2ded
r2deš
rdi2
r1d2n
rd2o
rd2ra
r1du
rdu1m
1r2e
2rea
2rebb
re2d
ree1
re2ge
re2gi
relo1
re2m
rena1
renu1
2reŋ
repo1
re2ra
re2s
res2t
reu1m
2režž
1ré
2r1f
rfá2
rfi2
rfy1
2r1g
rga1
rg2ŋ
2r1h
1ri
ri2dn
riea1
r1ien
ri1er
rigá1
rii1k
rika1
riko1
ri2l
rimi1
2rin
ri2os
ri1ot
2rip
ri2si1
ri2sk
r1iso
rita1
rivi1
riza1
2rj
r1ja
rja2g
r1je1
r1ji2
r1jo
r1ju
2rk
rke2n
rkke1
r1ko
rku1l
2r1l
rla2s
rlá1d
2r1m
rmo1
2r1n2
rna2
r2o
1ro.
2roa
1rob
1rod
ro1du1
1roh
ro1ji
1rol
1ron.
rono1
ro1še
1rošš
1rot.
roto1
1rovd
rovi1
2rp
rp2h
rpo2
r1p2r
2r1r
rra2s
rrat2
rrá2
rre1a
rre1b
rris2
rro2
2r1s
rsá2
rs2k
rs2p
rspi1
rs2t
rsyn1
2rš
r1ši
r1šo
2rt
r2te
rtu1
1ru
2rue
rui1d
ru1in
ru1is
2ruk
ru2m
2rumb
rum1s
2rv
rva1t
rvá2
rve2s
r1vi2
rvvá2
r1w
rwi1
1ry
rå2
2r'
1sa
sa2ba
sa2du
sae1
sa2ga
sa2go
sa2gu
sa2h
sa1is
s2a2m
s1amb
s2a2n
s1arm
s2a2s
sask2
s2at
sata1
1sá
ságu1
sá2h
sá2j
s2á2l
sá2mo
sá2n
sár1d
s1árp
sá2š
2s1b2
sc2
sce1
s1č
2s1d2
sdil1
1s2e
2sea
seda1
se2di
se1je
semb1
se2ra
se2sa
set1
1sf
2s1g
s1ha
sha1k
sha2s
s2he
s1hi
1s2i
si2ba
sibi1
sid2j
si1e
siel1
2s1ij
si2li
sio1
si2se
s1j
sja1
sji1
s2ka
ská2n
1skás
ske2n
1s2ker
skes1
skik1
ski2m
2skk
2skl
skla1
sklu1
skor1
1skov
sk2r
skud1
1s2kun
1s2kuo
1skur
1s2kuv
sk2v
s1l
2sm
s2me.
s2med
s2miš
sm2o
smo1s
s1n2
snás1
snei1
s2nu
1so
2soa
soar1
so2d
s2oh
soi1d
so2la
solž1
sona1
so2ni
so2p
so2re
sor2i
so2ru
s2os
so2t1
1s2pál
1s2pe
1spir
spi2s
sp2l
sple1
sp2o
spor1
s1p2r
spu1m
2s1r
sra1
2s1s
ssá2
sse1b
sse2g
ssi2d
ssi2l
sso2m
ssu2l
ssu2m
s1š
2st
sta1b
sta2g
s2tah
stai1
1sta2r
1staš
stá2l
s2tán
stá1š
1stáv
s2tea
s2ted
s2teh
s2tei
s2tep
s2tes
s2teš
s2tež
stie1
s2tin
s2tit
s2tiv
st2o2
s2tuh
s2tum
1stuo
s2tus
s2ty1
1su.
1sub
1sud
su2go
1suh
1sui
sui1s
1sul
1suo
s2u2p
1sur
s2us
1susa
1suse
1susk
1suso
sute1
1sutn
s1uvn
1suvv
2s1v
svál1
svi2
svis1
1sy
syhe1
sy2n
syp1
sy2s
syt2
1ša
ša2b
ša2d
šadu1
ša2g
ša2h
ša2me
ša2n
ša2se
1šá
šá2b
šá2d
šá2j
šá1le
šá2m
šá2n
šás2
š1b
š1c
š1č
š1d2
šdil1
1šead
1šeak
1šeav
1šek
1šem
1šer
šeš1
1šett
ševa1
š1f
2š1g
š1h
ši2d
1šie
ši1hu
1šio
š1ip
ši2ra
ši2s2
1šiss
š1j
ška2
šká2n
šken1
ški2
š1ko2
šk2r
šku2
šl2
2š1m
šmi2
šmmo1
š1n
šna1
2šoa
šo2be
1š2o2d
šogá2
šo2la
šo2m
1šon
šona1
š1p2r
2š1r
š1s2
2š1š
šša2
šše1a
šše1b
ššo2
2št
šta2
š2tan
štas1
štá2
šti2
što2
š2tuh
1šu
šu2g
šu2l
šu2m
2š1v
šva2l
1šy
1ta
2tač
2tadd
ta2ga
ta2gi
ta2h
talt1
ta2me
ta2n
ta1nj
t2as
ta2sa
ta2sá
ta2se
task2
ta2š
1tá
tá2b
tá2de
tádu1
2ták
tá2m
tána1
tá2ne
tá2ni
tás2m
2t1b
tbár1
tbea1
t1c
2t1č
2t1d2
tdu1
1t2e
teat1
te1b
te2d
te1f
te2gi
te1in
te1is
te1lu
te2n
ter1d
te2š
2tett
te2ž
1té
2t1g
tge2
2th
tha2
t1hag
t1hi
1ti
ti2b
ti2d
ti1en
ti1er
t2ii
til1d
2tilg
tilo1
t2i2m
ti1n
tina1
ti2on
ti1op
ti1r
2tiš
tivá1
tivo1
t1j
2t1k
tka2
tká2
2t1l
tla2
2t1m
tmas2
tmie1
tmme1
2t1n2
tna2
tnai1
tná2
tne1b
tnet1
tnja2
tno1s
tnu2
1to
2toa
toai1
to1al
to2ba
to2d
t2oi
tois2
to2la
to2le
to2li
tome1
t2on
to2nu
to1p
topá1
to2r
tor1t
tota1
tot2t
to1ul1
2t1p2
tpo1
2t1r
1t2rah
trai1
tras1
t2rá
1trái
tric1
tril1
triu1
t2rus
2t1s2
tsmi1
t1š
2t1t
tta2r
ttat1
ttá2d
ttá2r
tte2s
ttet1
tti2
tto1u
tt2r
ttu1r
1tu
tua1
tugi1
tu2go
tu2la
tu2m
tu2na
tu1ne
2tup
tur1t
2t1v
1ty
ty2d
ty2n
tys2
ty2sa
1tä
1tö
1ŧa
ŧá2
ŧes2
ŧi2
1ŧo2
ŧ1ŧ
u1a
uali1
u1á1
u2ba2
u2b1ár
ubb2
uber1
ub1or
u2bu
2uč
2ud
u2d2a
udal1
u2di
u1e
u1f
uf2l
u1ga
ugai1
u1go
ug1r
ugu1
2u2h
uhal1
uhas1
uhka2
uhká2
u1ho
uhu1m
2ui
ui1b2
u2id
uid2n
uig2ŋ
uih1
u1ii
uil1
ui1le
uis2k
uis2m
uiso2
uis2t
u1iš
uita1
u1j
uju1h
u2k
uka1
u1ko1
ukta2
2ul
ulai1
u2lan
ulas1
u1lá
u1le
ule2n
ulga1
u1li
ulo1s
ulu1m
u2ma
1umd
u2met
1umh
u2mi
1umlá
u2mo2
2un
u2ni
un1j
un2ko
unne2
u2no
unu1
u2oi
uoi1d
uo1j
uora2
uo2s
uo2t
u2ov
uovl1
u2pa
1upb
upe1
1upg
1upi
up1l
1u2po
uppe1
upra1
upre1
u1ra
u1rá
urba1
ur2du
urgo1
ur2i
uri1e
u1ro
uro2n
urot2
u2s
useš1
us1h
us1ko
usso2
us2t
uste2
2uš
u1še
uš1l
u1šo
2ut
ut1ar
ut1ár
ut1h
uti1
utta2
uttá2
u1u2
uvai1
uvi1h
uvii1
uvva2
ux2
2už
u1ža
u1že
u1ži
1va
vaa2
va2d
va2g
va2ha
va2he
va2m
vamu1
va2n
vapo1
var1t
va2s
vato1
1vá
váil1
vá2l
vá2m
vámu1
2vč
2v1d2
vda2
vdá2l
vdi2m
1ve
ve1b
ve1du
ve1ji
velo1
ves1t
vete1
v1f
v1g
vgi2
vg2ŋ
vgu1
1vi.
1via
1viá
1vib
vi2ba
1vic
1vi2d
2vidj
vi1đ
1viđe1
1viđi
1vie
vi1er
1vig
1vih
1vii
vika1
1vil
vild1
vi2me
vi2mo
1vin
1vi1o
1vir
1vis
vi2si
vi2sk
viso1
vis2t
1vit
1viv
viva1
vi2vi
v1ja2
v1je
vje1h
v1ji
vjjo2
v1jo
v1ju
vka1
vka2l
v1ko
vko2b
vko2l
vla2
v1lá
v1le
vle1s
v1li
vlli2
vlo2n
v1lu
vnná2
vŋŋá2
1vo
v2o1a
vo2b
v1ođ
voju1
vo2l
vo2m
v1p
vpi2
vp2r
v1r
vra2s
vre2
v2roi
vro2l
vro2n
2vs
vses1
vs2k
v1ská
v1ske
v1sko
v1sku
vs2t
v1sta
v1sti
v1š
2vt
vttá2
vtte2
1vu
vud1
vuga1
vui1d
vu1m
vuro2
2v1v
vva2r
vvá2r
vvi2l
v1že
v1ži
1vø
1wa2
w1b
1we
w1g
w1k
w1l
w1m
w1v
x1a
xa2h
xai1
xa2l
xa2me
xami1
xa2s
x1á
x1d
x1e
x1h
xha1
x1i1
xis1t
x1k
xkla1
x1o
x1p2
xpi1
xpor1
x1r
x1v
1y1a
y2ad
y2a2h
y2a2m
ya1s
yat2
y1á
y1b
ybe2
y1de
y2d1i
ydra1
y1f
1yfe
yfes1
y1g
y2h
y1i
y2id
yida2
yi2do
1yii
y1k
ykke1
y2kl
y1l
ylu1
y2me
ymna1
ymo1
ympo1
y1n
ynd2
yne1
yn1er
ynes1
y1ou
y1r
yra2h
yra2s
yro1
ysat2
ysk2
yso1
yto1
y1v
y2vi
yx1
yxa2
1za
za2d
za2g
za2h
za2l
za2m
za2n
za2s
zask2
zat2t
1zá2
2z1b
1ze
ze1b
2z1g
1zi2
2z1m
1zo
2zoa
z1oi
zo2l
zo2m
zo2n
1zu2
2z1v
2z1z
zzes1
ža2d
žadu1
2žage
1žah
žai1
1žak
1ža2l
ža2m
ža2n
ža2š
1žatg
1žatm
2žaž
1žá2
žámu1
žás2
1že1b
1žed
1žes
1žeš
1žež
ž2h
1ži.
1žih
1žik
ži2l
ži2s2
ž1k
žkon1
2ž1m
1žo2
ž1oi
žos1m
1žu2
žuhu1
ž1v
2ž1ž
žža2
æ1f
æfe2
æ1l
ä1d
ä1l
ä1n
ä1r
ø1d
2øi
ø1s
øsao1
ö1n
öni1
å1b
å1g
å2h
åi2
å1k
å2l
å2m
å2n
å1o
å1s2
å1v
åvi1
'1á
'1č
'1e
'1g
'1i
'1o
